Hawaii statutes.
§490:11-102 Preservation of old transition
provision. The provisions of chapter 490, effective on January 1, 1967,
herein referred to as "old U.C.C." shall continue to apply to the
amendments herein provided herein referred to as "new U.C.C." and for
this purpose the old U.C.C. and new U.C.C. shall be considered one continuous
statute. [L 1978, c 155, pt of §1(34)]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next